Missouri, session 2026, SB1516.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 272, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
two new sections, to be known as sections 272.138 and 272.380,
to read as follows:
272.138. When an owner of real estate desires to
construct, maintain, or repair a division fence to enclose a
field or enclosure where animals are kept as provided under
section 272.010, such owner, or a contractor hired by such
owner, may enter on the adjoining property up to a distance
of ten feet for the length of such division fence to
construct, maintain, or repair such division fence. The
owner or contractor constructing, maintaining, or repairing
such division fence is not guilty of trespass for entering
onto the adjoining property during the construction,
maintenance, or repair of such division fence, provided that
the owner or contractor does not enter onto the adjoining
property beyond the ten feet specified in this section.
However, such owner or contractor shall be liable for all
damages, if any, caused by entry onto the adjoining
property, including damages to crops. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, the owner or contractor

SB 1516 2
that constructs, maintains, or repairs such division fence
under this section shall not be liable for damages for
clearing or removing any tree, brush, or vegetation that
lies directly upon the property boundary line where such
division fence is constructed, maintained, or repaired, so
that such division fence may be constructed, maintained, or
repaired upon such property boundary line. The provisions
of this section shall not apply when the adjoining property
is owned or operated by any utility company, railroad, or a
zoological park, wildlife conservation facility, or animal
sanctuary accredited by the Association of Zoos and
Aquariums or a similarly recognized accrediting body.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow an owner
or contractor to enter into a building on the adjoining
property.
272.380. When an owner of real estate desires to
construct, maintain, or repair a division fence to enclose a
field or enclosure where animals are kept or placed as
provided under section 272.220, such owner, or a contractor
hired by such owner, may enter on the adjoining property up
to a distance of ten feet for the length of such division
fence to construct, maintain, or repair such division
fence. The owner or contractor constructing, maintaining,
or repairing such division fence is not guilty of trespass
for entering onto the adjoining property during the
construction, maintenance, or repair of such division fence,
provided that the owner or contractor does not enter onto
the adjoining property beyond the ten feet specified in this
section. However, such owner or contractor shall be liable
for all damages, if any, caused by entry onto the adjoining
property, including damages to crops. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, the owner or contractor

SB 1516 3
that constructs, maintains, or repairs such division fence
under this section shall not be liable for damages for
clearing or removing any tree, brush, or vegetation that
lies directly upon the property boundary line where such
division fence is constructed, maintained, or repaired, so
that such division fence may be constructed, maintained, or
repaired upon such property boundary line. The provisions
of this section shall not apply when the adjoining property
is owned or operated by any utility company, railroad, or a
zoological park, wildlife conservation facility, or animal
sanctuary accredited by the Association of Zoos and
Aquariums or a similarly recognized accrediting body.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow an owner
or contractor to enter into a building on the adjoining
property.
✓